District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.06

Fair market provision.

The provisions of § 31-3303.07(j) shall apply to health insurance coverage offered by a health insurer in the individual market in the same manner as they apply to health insurance coverage offered by a health insurer in connection with a group health plan in the small or large group market.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 206, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1027.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.